Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3809
Transportation costs; how paid.

The costs of transporting prisoners to and from the city or county in which any untried indictment, information, or complaint is pending as provided in sections 29-3801 to 29-3809 shall be paid by the city or county.

Laws 1984, LB 591, § 9.